District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.22

Additional penalties for public officials.

(a)

In addition to the penalties set forth in § 1-1162.21, the Ethics Board may censure a public official for a violation of the Code of Conduct that the Ethics Board finds to substantially threaten the public trust.

(b)

The Ethics Board may recommend in such censure that the Council suspend or remove a Councilmember’s committee chairmanship, if any, committee membership, if any, or vote in any committee.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 222, 59 DCR 1862